Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 2
ELECTION CONTESTS

1-11-201. Causes of contest.

The election of any candidate to any office may be contested on any of the following grounds:

That the candidate elected is not eligible to hold the office for which elected;

That illegal votes were received or legal votes rejected at the polls in sufficient numbers to change the result of the election;

That an election judge or canvass board has made an error in counting or declaring the result of an election that changed the result of the election;

That an election judge, canvass board, or member of a canvass board has committed malconduct, fraud, or corruption that changed the result of the election; or

That, for any reason, another candidate was legally elected to the office.

For the purpose of this part 2, if the election or nomination of either the governor or lieutenant governor is found to be invalid for any reason, the finding shall not in any way be construed to invalidate the election or nomination of the other joint candidate.

The result of any election to determine a ballot issue or ballot question may be contested on any of the following grounds:

That illegal votes were received or legal votes were rejected at the polls in sufficient numbers to change the result of the election;

That an election judge or canvass board has made an error in counting or declaring the result of an election that changed the result of the election; or

That an election judge, canvass board, or member of a canvass board has committed misconduct, fraud, or corruption that changed the result of the election.

In addition to the grounds set forth in subsection (3) of this section, the result of any election to determine a ballot issue that includes approval of the creation of any debt or other financial obligation may be contested if the notice required by section 1-7-908 is not provided in accordance with that section or contains any material misstatement of the information required to be set forth in the notice.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 785, § 14, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 94:

(3) added, p. 1175, § 62, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(1)(c), (1)(d), (3)(b), and (3)(c) amended, p. 490, § 19, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(4) added, p. 749, § 2, effective August 6.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-11-201 as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

For contests for county and nonpartisan officers, ballot issues, and ballot questions, see § 1-11-212; for contested elections, see C.R.C.P. 100.

1-11-202. Who may contest election.

The election of any candidate or the results of an election on any ballot issue or ballot question may be contested by any eligible elector of the political subdivision.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 786, § 14, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1175, § 63, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For causes of contest, see § 1-11-201; for contested elections, see C.R.C.P. 100.

1-11-203. Contests arising out of primary elections.

All election contests arising out of a primary election, except contests for national or state offices, shall be summarily adjudicated by the district court sitting for the political subdivision within which a contest arises. The court which first acquires jurisdiction of any contest shall have original jurisdiction, subject to appellate review as provided by law and the Colorado appellate rules. In all cases involving contests for state offices, the supreme court shall take original jurisdiction for the purpose of summarily adjudicating any contest.

Every contest shall be instituted by verified petition to the proper court, setting forth the grounds for the contest. The petition shall be filed and a copy served on the contestee within five days after the occurrence of the grounds of the contest. The contestee shall answer under oath within five days after service. If the petition cannot be personally served within the state on the contestee, service may be made by leaving a copy of the petition with the clerk of the court having original jurisdiction of the controversy or contest who shall search for the contestee so that an answer may be filed. Upon the expiration of the time for the answer, the court having jurisdiction of the contest shall forthwith set the matter for trial on the merits and shall summarily adjudicate it.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 786, § 14, effective January 1, 1993.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-11-214 as it existed prior to 1992.

1-11-203.5. Contests concerning ballot order or ballot title - ballot issue or ballot question elections.

Except for petitions for rehearing pursuant to section 1-40-107, all election contests arising out of a ballot issue or ballot question election concerning the order on the ballot or the form or content of any ballot title shall be summarily adjudicated by the district court sitting for the political subdivision within which the contest arises prior to the election. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the style and form of process, the manner of service of process and papers, the fees of officers, and judgment for costs shall be according to the rules and practice of the district court. The court that first acquires jurisdiction of any contest shall have exclusive jurisdiction. Before the district court is required to take jurisdiction of the contest, the contestor shall file with the clerk of the court a bond, with sureties, running to the contestee and conditioned to pay all costs, including attorneys fees, in case of failure to maintain the contest. The judge shall determine the sufficiency of the bond and, if sufficient, approve it.

Every such contest shall be commenced by verified petition filed by the contestor to the proper court, setting forth the grounds for the contest and a proposed alternative order for the ballot or alternative form or content for the contested ballot title. The contestee shall be the state in the case of a statewide ballot issue or statewide ballot question or the political subdivision that proposed to place the contested ballot issue or ballot question on the ballot, as applicable, and the petition representative of an initiated measure. The petition shall be filed and a copy served on the contestee within five days after the title of the ballot issue or ballot question is set by the state or political subdivision and for contests concerning the order of a ballot, within five days after the ballot order is set by the county clerk and recorder and not thereafter. The designated election official or other authorized official, on behalf of the contestee and the proponent of an initiated measure, shall answer under oath within five days after service. Upon the expiration of the time for the answer, and following at least twenty-four hours advance notice of the date, time, and place of the adjudication given by the clerk of the court by letter, telephone, or fax to the contestor and contestee, the court having jurisdiction of the contest shall immediately set the matter for trial on the merits and shall adjudicate it within ten days of the date of filing of the answer by the contestee or expiration of the time for the answer.

If the court finds that the order of the ballot or the form or content of the ballot title does not conform to the requirements of the state constitution and statutes, the court shall provide in its order the text of the corrected ballot title or the corrected order of the measures to be placed upon the ballot and shall award costs and reasonable attorneys fees to the contestor. If the court finds that the order of the ballot and the form and content of the ballot title conform to the requirements of the state constitution and statutes and further finds that the suit was frivolous as provided in article 17 of title 13, C.R.S., the court shall provide in its order an award of costs and reasonable attorneys fees to the contestee state or political subdivision and to the proponent of an initiated measure.

Following entry of the order of the district court pursuant to this section, the ballot title shall be certified by the state or political subdivision to the county clerk and recorder, to be voted upon at the election as so certified unless the election on the ballot issue or ballot question is canceled in the manner provided by law. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any appeal from an order of the district court entered pursuant to this section shall be taken directly to the supreme court, which shall decide the appeal as expeditiously as practicable.

The procedure provided in this section shall be the exclusive procedure to contest or otherwise challenge the order of the ballot or the form or content of the ballot title.

This section shall not apply to a ballot title for a statewide ballot issue or statewide ballot question that is set by a title setting board or court as provided by law.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire section added, p. 1175, § 64, effective July 1.

1-11-204. Contests for presidential elector.

The supreme court has original jurisdiction for the adjudication of contests concerning presidential electors and shall prescribe rules for practice and proceedings for such contests. No justice of the court who is a contestor in the election contest shall be permitted to hear and determine the matter.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 786, § 14, effective January 1, 1993.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-11-202 as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

For contested elections, see C.R.C.P. 100.

1-11-205. Contests for state officers.

Proceedings to contest the election of any person declared elected governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, state treasurer, attorney general, member of the state board of education, or regent of the university of Colorado may be commenced by filing with the secretary of the senate, between the sixth and tenth legislative days of the first session of the general assembly after the day of the election, a notice of intention to contest the election, specifying the particular grounds on which the contestor means to rely. The contestor shall file with the secretary of the senate a bond, with sureties, running to the contestee and conditioned to pay all costs in case of failure to maintain the contest. The secretary of the senate shall determine the sufficiency of the bond, and, if it is sufficient, approve it.

Upon the notice of intention being filed, and the bond being approved by the secretary of the senate, the general assembly shall determine by resolution on what day they will meet in joint session to take action in the contest.

A certified copy of the notice filed by any contestor shall be served upon the contestee, together with a notice that the contestee is required to attend the joint session on the day fixed to answer the contest.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 786, § 14, effective January 1, 1993.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-11-203 as it existed prior to 1992.

1-11-206. Evidence in contests for state officers.

On the hearing of any election contest for any of the offices named in section 1-11-205, the parties to the contest may introduce written testimony, taken in a manner prescribed by the joint session. No depositions shall be read in the hearing unless the opposite party had reasonable notice of the time and place of the taking of the deposition.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 787, § 14, effective January 1, 1993.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-11-204 as it existed prior to 1992.

1-11-207. Rules for conducting contests for state officers.

In conducting any election contest for any of the offices named in section 1-11-205, the following rules apply:

On the appointed day and hour, the general assembly, with its proper officers, shall convene in joint session.

The president of the senate shall preside; but, when the president is the contestee, the president pro tempore of the senate shall preside.

The parties to the contest shall then be called by the secretary of the senate. If they answer, their appearance shall be recorded.

The testimony of the contestor shall be introduced first, followed by the testimony of the contestee. After the testimony has been presented on both sides, the contestor or contestor's counsel may open the argument, and the contestee or counsel may then proceed to make a defense, and the contestor may be heard in reply.

After the arguments by the parties are completed, any member of the joint session may offer the reasons for the member's intended vote. The session may limit the time for argument and debate.

The secretary of the senate shall keep a regular journal of the proceedings. The decision shall be taken by a call of the members, and a majority of all the votes given shall prevail.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 787, § 14, effective January 1, 1993.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-11-205 as it existed prior to 1992.

1-11-208. Contests for state senator or representative.

The election of any person as a state senator or a member of the state house of representatives may be contested by any eligible elector of the district to be represented by the senator or representative. Each house of the general assembly shall hear and determine election contests of its own members. In furtherance of resolving such a contest, the house of the general assembly before which any contest is to be tried shall certify questions pursuant to section 1-11-208.5 to the office of administrative courts for referral to an administrative law judge.

The contestor, within ten days after the completion of the official abstract of votes cast, shall file in the office of the secretary of state a verified statement of intention to contest the election, setting forth the name of the contestor, that the contestor is an eligible elector of the district, the name of the contestee, the office being contested, the time of the election, and the particular grounds for the contest, and shall serve a copy upon the contestee. The contestor shall file with the secretary of state fifteen thousand dollars to be placed in escrow running to the contestee and conditioned to pay all costs in case of failure to maintain the contest.

The contestee, within ten days after personal service of the statement, shall file in the office of the secretary of state an answer, duly verified, admitting or specifically denying each allegation and containing any new matter or counterstatement which the contestee believes may entitle him or her to retain the seat in the general assembly to which elected. The contestee shall serve a copy upon the contestor.

When the answer of the contestee contains new matter constituting a counterstatement, the contestor, within ten days after the service of the answer, shall file in the office of the secretary of state a reply admitting or specifically denying under oath each allegation contained in the counterstatement, and shall serve a copy upon the contestee.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 788, § 14, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 99:

(1) amended, p. 1384, § 2, effective June 4; (2) amended, p. 491, § 20, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(1) amended, p. 852, § 5, effective June 1.

L. 2021:

(2) amended, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1653, § 51, effective June 21.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-11-206 as it existed prior to 1992.

1-11-208.5. Certification of questions to administrative law judge.

The house of the general assembly in which any contest for senator or representative, as applicable, is to be tried shall certify questions to the office of administrative courts for referral to an administrative law judge. The questions shall relate exclusively to the election returns in the district and the number of votes cast for each of the candidates for the contested seat. No question may be certified regarding the eligibility or qualification of any person for the contested office.

Upon certification pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the house of the general assembly in which the contest is to be tried shall transmit to the administrative law judge any papers submitted by the secretary of state pursuant to section 1-11-210 or any other documents submitted to that house in connection with the election contest.

The administrative law judge shall have jurisdiction to make findings of fact on the questions certified by a house of the general assembly pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. Further evidence upon the points specified in such questions may be submitted by the contestor, the contestee, or both, in such contest. The administrative law judge may take and consider such additional evidence but shall limit its findings of fact to the questions certified.

Any issues of law or findings of fact decided in a prior judicial proceeding that affect a party that contests an election for state senator or representative pursuant to section 1-11-208 shall not be conclusive upon an administrative law judge conducting fact finding or making recommendations pursuant to this section.

The administrative law judge shall hold a hearing within twenty days after the date that questions were certified to the administrative law judge pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. The administrative law judge's findings of fact and recommendations shall be completed not more than ten days after the date of the hearing. Such findings of fact and recommendations shall take precedence over all other business of the administrative law judge.

If the administrative law judge finds that, based on a preponderance of the evidence, an accurate and verifiable vote count can be determined in the contested district showing that a person had the highest number of votes cast in the district for the contested state senate or state house of representatives seat, the administrative law judge shall make recommendations to the house that certified the questions, including, but not limited to, that such person be seated as the senator or representative from the contested district.

If the administrative law judge finds that, based on a preponderance of the evidence, irregularities in the votes cast or counted in the district for the contested state senate or state house of representatives seat both prevented an accurate and verifiable vote count and may have directly affected the outcome of the election, the administrative law judge shall make recommendations to the house that certified the questions, including, but not limited to, that such house further resolve the election contest or call a special legislative election pursuant to section 1-11-303.

The administrative law judge shall transmit all the files and records of the proceedings to the presiding officer of the house in which the contest for senator or representative was filed.

The administrative law judge's findings of fact and recommendations shall be final and not be subject to review by any other court.

Upon receipt of such findings of fact and recommendations, the house in which the contest for senator or representative arose may take appropriate action, including, but not limited to:

A trial of the election contest;

Declaration of the duly elected member in the contested district in accordance with the findings of the administrative law judge; or

Adoption of a resolution pursuant to section 1-11-302 calling for a special legislative election.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire section added, p. 1385, § 3, effective June 4.

L. 2005:

(1) amended, p. 853, § 6, effective June 1.

1-11-209. Depositions in contests for state senator or representative.

Either party, at the time the statement or answer is served, may serve upon the adverse party reasonable notice of taking depositions to be used at trial of the contest for state senator or state representative. Immediately after joining issue of fact, both parties shall proceed with all reasonable diligence to take any depositions they may desire to use at trial. Nothing in this subsection (1) shall abridge the right of either party to take depositions upon reasonable notice prior to the joining of issue in relation to any of the matters in controversy; but a failure to take depositions before the joining of issue shall not be held as laches against either party to the contest.

If, upon the completion of taking any depositions, the adverse party has any witnesses present before the officer taking the depositions whose testimony the adverse party may wish to use in rebuttal of the depositions, the adverse party may proceed immediately to take the deposition of the rebutting witness before the officer, upon giving written notice to the other party or the other party's attorney. The officer shall attach to the depositions a copy of the notice with proof of service and shall return the rebuttal depositions in the same manner provided for returning depositions in chief. The party taking a deposition shall pay all costs of taking the deposition and its return.

The time for taking depositions to be used at trial of the contest shall expire three days prior to the meeting of the next general assembly. Both parties may take depositions at the same time, but neither party shall take depositions at more than one place at the same time. Nothing in this subsection (3) shall be construed to abridge the right of either house of the general assembly, upon good cause shown, to extend the time to take depositions, or to send for and examine any witness, or to take any testimony it may desire to use on trial of the contest, or to order a recount of the ballots if there has been an error in surveying the returns in any county or precinct.

Any county or district judge of or for a county in the judicial district where a contested election case arises may issue subpoenas, compel the attendance of witnesses, take depositions, and certify depositions according to the rules of the district court.

The officer before whom the depositions are taken, upon the completion thereof, shall certify the depositions immediately, shall enclose the depositions, and the notices for taking the depositions, and the proofs of service of the notices in an envelope, and shall seal and transmit the envelope by mail or in person by a sworn officer, to the secretary of state, with an endorsement showing the nature of the papers, the names of the contesting parties, and the house of the general assembly before which the contest is to be tried.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 789, § 14, effective January 1, 1993.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-11-207 as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

For depositions, see C.R.C.P. 26 to 37; for causes of contest, see § 1-11-201; for venue, see C.R.C.P. 98 and Crim. P. 18; for contested elections, see C.R.C.P. 100.

1-11-210. Secretary of state to transmit papers in contests for state senator or representative.

The secretary of state shall deliver the sealed envelope containing depositions, notices, and proofs of service, together with the statement of contestor, answer of contestee, and reply, to the presiding officer of the body in which the contest for senator or representative is to be tried, immediately upon the organization of the body or as soon thereafter as documents are received. The presiding officer, immediately upon receiving the documents, shall give notice to the body that the papers are in the officer's possession.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 790, § 14, effective January 1, 1993.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-11-208 as it existed prior to 1992.

1-11-211. Contests for district attorneys.

The district court of the judicial district in which the contest for the office of district attorney arises has jurisdiction for the adjudication of contests for the office of district attorney. No district judge who is a contestor in any election contest shall be permitted to hear and determine the matter. In that case, the supreme court shall appoint a district judge to hear and decide the contest.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 790, § 14, effective January 1, 1993.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-11-209 as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

For venue, see C.R.C.P. 98 and Crim. P. 18; for contested elections, see C.R.C.P. 100.

1-11-212. Contests for county and nonpartisan officers - ballot issues and ballot questions.

Contested election cases of county and nonpartisan officers and ballot issues and ballot questions shall be tried and decided by the district court for the county in which the contest arises. If a political subdivision is located in more than one county, the district court of either county may take jurisdiction.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 790, § 14, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1177, § 65, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-11-201 (1) as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

For contested elections, see C.R.C.P. 100.

1-11-212.5. Contests concerning bond elections.

Except as otherwise provided in this part 2, the result of an election on a ballot issue seeking approval to create any debt or other financial obligation may be contested based on the grounds set forth in section 1-11-201 (4) in the manner provided by this part 2 for contesting the result of any other election.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire section added, p. 749, § 3, effective August 6.

1-11-213. Rules for conducting contests in district court.

The style and form of process, the manner of service of process and papers, the fees of officers, and judgment for costs and execution shall be according to the rules and practice of the district court.

Change of venue may be taken from any district court for any cause in which changes of venue might be taken in civil or criminal actions. The decisions of any district court are subject to appellate review as provided by law and the Colorado appellate rules.

Before the district court is required to take jurisdiction of the contest, the contestor shall file with the clerk of the court a bond, with sureties, running to the contestee and conditioned to pay all costs in case of failure to maintain the contest. The judge shall determine the sufficiency of the bond and, if it is sufficient, approve it.

The contestor, within ten days after the official survey of returns has been filed with the designated election official, shall file in the office of the clerk of the district court a written statement of the intention to contest the election, setting forth the name of the contestor, that the contestor is an eligible elector of the political subdivision, the name of the contestee, the office or ballot issue or ballot question being contested, the time of the election, and the particular grounds for the contest. The statement shall be verified upon information and belief by the affidavit of the contestor or of an eligible elector of the political subdivision. If the contest is based upon a ballot issue or ballot question, the political subdivision or subdivisions for which the ballot issue or ballot question was decided shall be named as a contestee. If a written statement of intent to contest the election is filed more than ten days after the completion of the official survey of returns, no court shall have jurisdiction over the contest.

The clerk of the district court shall then issue a summons in the ordinary form, in which the contestor shall be named as plaintiff and the contestee as defendant, stating the court to which the action is being brought, the political subdivision for which the contest is filed, and a brief statement of the grounds for contest as set forth in the contestor's statement. The summons shall be served upon the contestee and political subdivision in the same manner as other district court summonses are served in this state, within ten days after the statement of intention is filed.

The contestee, within ten days after the service of the summons, shall file an answer with the clerk of court, which admits or specifically denies each allegation of the statement and asserts any counterstatement on which the contestee relies as entitling him or her to the office to which elected.

If a contestor alleges the reception of illegal votes or the rejection of legal votes as the grounds for the contest, a list of the eligible electors who so voted or offered to vote shall be set forth in the statement of the contestor and likewise in the answer of contestee if the same grounds are alleged in the counterstatement.

When the answer of the contestee contains a new matter constituting a counterstatement, within ten days after the answer is filed, the contestor shall file a reply with the clerk of court admitting or specifically denying, under oath, each allegation contained in the counterstatement.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 790, § 14, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 94:

(4) and (5) amended, p. 1177, § 66, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-11-210 as it existed prior to 1992.

1-11-214. Trial and appeals in contests for county and nonpartisan elections.

Immediately after the issue is joined, the district judge shall set the date for trial, which shall be not more than twenty days nor less than ten days after the issue was joined. The trial shall take precedence over all other business of the court. Any depositions to be used in the trial may be taken upon four days' notice before any officer authorized to take depositions. The testimony at trial may be made orally or by depositions. The district judge shall cause the testimony to be taken in full and filed in the cause. The trial shall be conducted according to district court rules and practice.

An appeal from the judgment may be taken to the supreme court, in the same manner as other cases tried in the district court. The appeal shall be filed, the bill of exceptions settled, the bond for costs executed and filed, and the record transmitted to the clerk of the supreme court within twenty days from the date the judgment is entered. The supreme court shall advance the case to the head of the calendar and shall hear and determine the matter with all reasonable dispatch.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 792, § 14, effective January 1, 1993.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-11-211 as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

For depositions, see C.R.C.P. 26 to 37; for trial of contested elections, see C.R.C.P. 100.

1-11-215. Recount in contests for county and nonpartisan elections.

If, at trial of any election contest as provided in section 1-11-214 and this section, the statement or counterstatement alleges an error in the abstract of votes cast sufficient to change the result, the district judge has the power to order a recount of the ballots cast or the votes tabulated in the precincts in which the alleged error was made. The court may also require the production before it of witnesses, documents, records, and other evidence as may have or contain information regarding the legality of any vote cast or counted for either of the contesting candidates or a ballot issue or ballot question, or concerning the correct number of votes cast for a candidate or a ballot issue or ballot question. The court may order the returns corrected in accordance with the evidence presented and the court's findings.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 792, § 14, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1178, § 67, effective July 1.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 491, § 21, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-11-212 as it existed prior to 1992.

1-11-216. Judgment in contests for county and nonpartisan elections.

The district court shall pronounce judgment on whether the contestee or any other person was legally elected to the contested office or on whether the ballot issue or ballot question was enacted. The court's judgment declaring a person elected entitles that person to take office when the term of office begins, upon proper qualification. If the judgment is against a contestee who has received a certificate, the judgment annuls the certificate. If the court finds that no person was legally elected, the judgment shall set aside the election and declare a vacancy in the office contested.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 792, § 14, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1178, § 68, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-11-213 as it existed prior to 1992.

1-11-216.5. Judgment in election contests - creation of financial obligation.

The district court shall pronounce judgment on whether the approval of a ballot issue to create any debt or other financial obligation should be set aside based on the grounds set forth in section 1-11-201 (4).

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire section added, p. 749, § 3, effective August 6.

1-11-217. Costs of election contest.

A judgment against the contestor pursuant to the provisions of sections 1-11-211 and 1-11-212, concerning election of a candidate or determination of a ballot question, shall provide that the contestor is liable for all fees incurred in the contested election by all contestees, including reasonable costs and attorney fees.

A judgment against the contestor pursuant to the provisions of sections 1-11-211 and 1-11-212, concerning the determination of a ballot issue, or pursuant to section 1-11-212.5, concerning the determination of a ballot issue that includes approval of the creation of any debt or other financial obligation, shall provide that the contestor is liable for all fees incurred in the contested election by all contestees, including reasonable costs and attorneys fees, but a judgment for costs and fees shall be awarded in favor of the state or a political subdivision only if the suit is ruled frivolous, as provided in article 17 of title 13, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 793, § 14, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1178, § 69, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(2) amended, p. 750, § 4, effective August 6.

1-11-218. Violations by the governing body.

If the results of any county or nonpartisan election are disallowed as the result of a proceeding held pursuant to sections 1-11-211 and 1-11-212, the elector who instituted the proceedings may commence a civil action to recover costs and reasonable attorney fees from the governing body.

If the result of any election approving the creation of any debt or other financial obligation is set aside as the result of a proceeding held pursuant to this part 2, the elector who instituted the proceeding may commence a civil action to recover costs and reasonable attorney fees from the governing body.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 793, § 14, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1179, § 70, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 750, § 5, effective August 6.